Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1498.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 21AUNIFORM PARTITION OF HEIRS PROPERTY ACTSec.21A21. Short title of chapter.21A22. Definitions.21A23. Applicability and relation to other law.21A23.1. Right of first refusal required.21A24. Service and notice by posting.21A24.1. Settlement conference.21A25. Hearing officers.<--1234567891011121314151617 21A26. Determination of value.21A27. Cotenant buyout.21A28. Partition alternatives.21A29. Considerations for partition in kind.21A30. Open-market sale, sealed bids or auction.21A31. Report of open-market sale.21A32. Uniformity of application and construction.21A33. Relation to Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act.§ 21A21. Short title of chapter.This chapter may be referred to as the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act.§ 21A22. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Ascendant." An individual who precedes another individual in lineage, in the direct line of ascent from the other individual."Collateral." An individual who is related to another individual under the law of intestate succession of this Commonwealth but who is not the other individual's ascendant or descendant."Cotenant." One of two or more individuals who together hold an ownership interest in real property as tenants in common."Descendant." An individual who follows another individual in lineage, in the direct line of descent from the other individual."Determination of value." A court order determining the fair market value of heirs property under section 21A26 (relating to 20250HB1498PN1832 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination of value) or 21A30 (relating to open-market sale, sealed bids or auction) or adopting the valuation of the property agreed to by all cotenants."Heirs property." Real property held in tenancy in common which satisfies all of the following requirements as of the filing of a partition action:(1) There is no agreement in a record binding all the cotenants which governs the partition of the property.(2) One or more of the cotenants acquired an equitable interest in the property via testate or intestate succession or acquired the title from a relative, whether living or deceased.(3) Any of the following applies:(i) twenty percent or more of the interests are held by cotenants who are relatives;(ii) twenty percent or more of the interests are held by an individual who acquired title from a relative, whether living or deceased; or(iii) twenty percent or more of the cotenants are relatives."Partition by sale." A court-ordered sale of the entire heirs property, whether by auction, sealed bids or open-market sale conducted under section 21A30."Partition in kind." The division of heirs property into physically separated titled parcels."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Relative." An ascendant, descendant or collateral or an individual otherwise related to another individual by blood, 20250HB1498PN1832 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 marriage, adoption or law of this Commonwealth other than this chapter.§ 21A23. Applicability and relation to other law.(a) Applicability.--This chapter applies to partition actions filed on or after the effective date of this section.(b) Determination.--In an action to partition real property, the court shall determine whether the property is heirs property. If the court determines that the property is heirs property, the property must be partitioned under this chapter unless all the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.(c) Supplementation.--This chapter supplements section 3534 (relating to distribution in kind) and, if an action is governed by this chapter, it replaces the provisions of section 3534 that are inconsistent with this chapter.§ 21A23.1. Right of first refusal required.When a cotenant receives a bona fide offer from a noncotenant to purchase a share or shares of an heir's property and the cotenant intends to accept or respond with a counteroffer, the cotenants who inherited their share or shares of the property or the cotenants who are relatives to those cotenants who inherited their share or shares of the property shall have the right to purchase the shares for the identical price, terms and conditions of the offer or counteroffer, with first priority to a cotenant who is in possession of the heir's property as their primary residence and second priority to a cotenant who otherwise utilizes the property.§ 21A24. Service and notice by posting.(a) Service of complaint.--This chapter does not limit or affect the method by which services of a complaint in a partition action may be made.20250HB1498PN1832 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Notice and posting.--If the plaintiff in a partition action seeks an order of notice by publication and the court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not later than 10 days after the court's determination, shall post and maintain while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject of the action. The sign shall state that the action has commenced and identify the name and address of the court and the common designation by which the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.§ 21A24.1. Settlement conference.(a) Conference required.--In a partition action of heirs property, after service and notice under section 21A24 (relating to service and notice by posting) and before additional action is taken, the court shall hold a mandatory settlement conference within 60 days after the date of determination of heirs property under section 21A23(b) (relating to applicability and relation to other law), or on a date agreed to by the parties, for the purpose of holding settlement discussions.(b) Notice.--After an heirs property determination is made under section 21A23(b), the court shall promptly send a notice to parties advising them of the time and place of the settlement conference, the purpose of the conference and the requirements of this section. The notice shall be in a form prescribed by the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts or, at the discretion of the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts, the administrative judge of the judicial district in which the action is pending. The plaintiff in the partition action shall post a copy of the settlement conference notice in a conspicuous 20250HB1498PN1832 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 place on the property within 20 days of the date of the notice.(c) Settlement conference.--The settlement conference may be adjourned or reconvened during the pendency of the partition action. At a conference held under this section, if the defendant is appearing pro se, the court shall advise the defendant of the nature of the action and the defendant's rights and responsibilities as a defendant.(d) Notice after failure to answer.--The following shall apply:(1) At the first settlement conference held under this section, if the defendant has not filed a responsive pleading, the court shall:(i) advise the defendant of the requirement to respond to the complaint;(ii) explain what is required to respond to a complaint in court;(iii) advise the defendant that the ability to contest the partition action and assert defenses may be lost if a response is not filed;(iv) set a deadline for any cotenants requesting partition by sale; and(v) provide information about available resources for legal assistance.(2) A defendant who appears at the settlement conference but fails to file a timely responsive pleading shall be presumed to have a reasonable excuse for the default and shall be permitted to serve and file a responsive pleading, without any substantive defenses deemed to have been waived, within 30 days of initial appearance at the settlement conference. The default shall be deemed vacated upon service 20250HB1498PN1832 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and filing of an answer or other responsive pleading.(e) Good faith negotiation required.--The plaintiffs and defendants shall negotiate in good faith to reach a mutually agreeable resolution, including, but not limited to, a tenancy in common agreement, a cotenant buyout and the allocation, mechanics and financing thereof or any other agreement or loss mitigation that is fair and reasonable considering the totality of factors.(f) Failure to reach resolution.--If the parties do not reach a mutually agreeable resolution, a judicial hearing officer or other staff designated by the court to oversee the settlement conference process shall make a report of findings of fact, conclusions of law and recommendations for relief to the court concerning any party's failure to negotiate in good faith under subsection (e). If the court determines a plaintiff has failed to negotiate in good faith, the court shall dismiss the partition action.(g) Abeyance allowed.--Motions submitted by a party to the action may be held in abeyance while the settlement conference process is ongoing, except for motions concerning:(1) a determination of the percentage interests, if any, owned by any alleged cotenant if the interests are in dispute; and(2) compliance with this section, including applications to extend deadlines specified in this section.§ 21A25. Hearing officers.If the court appoints hearing officers under Pa.R.C.P. No. 1558 (relating to preliminary conference appointment of hearing officer), each hearing officer, in addition to the requirements and disqualifications applicable to hearing officers, must be 20250HB1498PN1832 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a participant in the action.§ 21A26. Determination of value.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if the court determines that the property that is the subject of a partition action is heirs property, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property by ordering an appraisal under subsection (d).(b) Agreement by cotenants.--If all cotenants have agreed to the value of the property or to another method of valuation, the court shall adopt that value or the value produced by the agreed method of valuation.(c) When determined by court.--If the court determines that the evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by the cost of the appraisal, the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.(d) Appointment of appraiser.--If the court orders an appraisal, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate appraiser licensed in this Commonwealth to determine the fair market value of the property assuming sole ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of the appraisal, the appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the court.(e) Notice.--If an appraisal is conducted under subsection (d), not later than 10 days after the appraisal is filed, the court shall send notice to each party with a known address, stating:(1) The appraised fair market value of the property.(2) That the appraisal is available at the clerk's office.20250HB1498PN1832 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) That a party may file with the court an objection to the appraisal not later than 30 days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the objection.(f) Hearing.--If an appraisal is filed with the court under subsection (d), the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the fair market value of the property not sooner than 30 days after a copy of the notice of the appraisal is sent to each party under subsection (e), whether or not an objection to the appraisal is filed under subsection (e)(3). In addition to the court-ordered appraisal, the court may consider any other evidence of value offered by a party.(g) Posthearing determination and notice.--After a hearing under subsection (f), but before considering the merits of the partition action, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.§ 21A27. Cotenant buyout.(a) Initial notice to parties.--If a cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value under section 21A26 (relating to determination of value), the court shall send notice to the parties that any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.(b) Cotenant notice to court.--Not later than 45 days after the notice is sent under subsection (a), any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may give notice to the court that it elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.(c) Purchase price.--The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that requested partition by sale is the 20250HB1498PN1832 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 value of the entire parcel determined under section 21A26 multiplied by the cotenant's fractional ownership of the entire parcel.(d) Subsequent court notice to parties.--After expiration of the period in subsection (b), the following rules apply:(1) If only one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall notify all the parties of that fact.(2) If more than one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall allocate the right to buy those interests among the electing cotenants based on each electing cotenant's existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants electing to buy and send notice to all the parties of that fact and of the price to be paid by each electing cotenant.(3) If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall send notice to all the parties of that fact and resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) (relating to partition alternatives).(e) Payment and effect.--If the court sends notice to the parties under subsection (d)(1) or (2), the court shall set a date, not sooner than 60 days after the date the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants must pay their apportioned price into the court. In determining an appropriate date by which electing cotenants must pay their apportioned price into the court, the court shall consider the time necessary to obtain financing and may extend the deadline upon request. After this 20250HB1498PN1832 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date, the following rules apply:(1) If all electing cotenants timely pay their apportioned price into court, the court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons entitled to them.(2) If no electing cotenant timely pays its apportioned price, the court shall resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.(3) If one or more but not all of the electing cotenants fail to pay their apportioned price on time, the court shall give notice to the electing cotenants that paid their apportioned price of the interest remaining and the price for all that interest.(f) Purchase of remaining interest.--Not later than 20 days after the court gives notice under subsection (e)(3), a cotenant that paid may elect to purchase all of the remaining interest by paying the entire price into the court. After the 20-day period, the following rules apply:(1) If only one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall issue an order reallocating the remaining interest to that cotenant. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating the interests of all of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them.(2) If no cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall resolve the partition action under section 21A28(a) and (b) as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not 20250HB1498PN1832 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchased.(3) If more than one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest among those paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant's original fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total original fractional ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the remaining interest. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating all of the cotenants' interests, disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court.(g) Request to authorize sale.--Not later than 45 days after the court sends notice to the parties under subsection (a), a cotenant entitled to buy an interest under this section may request the court to authorize the sale as part of the pending action of the interests of cotenants named as defendants and served with the complaint but that did not appear in the action.(h) Denial of request or authorization of sale.--If the court receives a timely request under subsection (g), the court, after hearing, may deny the request or authorize the requested additional sale on such terms as the court determines to be fair and reasonable, subject to the following limitations:(1) A sale authorized under this subsection may occur only after the purchase prices for all interests subject to sale under subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) have been paid into court and those interests have been reallocated among the cotenants as provided in those subsections.(2) The purchase price for the interest of a nonappearing cotenant is based on the court's determination 20250HB1498PN1832 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of value under section 21A28 21A26 . § 21A28. Partition alternatives.(a) Partition in kind.--If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not purchased by other cotenants under section 21A27 (relating to cotenant buyout) or if, after conclusion of the buyout under section 21A27, a cotenant remains that has requested partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the court, after consideration of the factors listed in section 21A29 (relating to considerations for partition in kind), finds that partition in kind will result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group. In considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a request by two or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.(b) Partition by sale or dismissal of action.--If the court does not order partition in kind under subsection (a), the court shall order partition by sale under section 21A30 (relating to open-market sale, sealed bids or auction) or, if no cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall dismiss the action.(c) Payments.--If the court orders partition in kind under subsection (a), the court may require that one or more cotenants pay one or more other cotenants amounts so that the payments, taken together with the value of the in-kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the partition in kind just and proportionate in value to the fractional interests held.(d) Allocation of interests among unknown, unlocatable or defaulting cotenants.--If the court orders partition in kind, the court shall allocate to the cotenants that are unknown, unlocatable or the subject of a default judgment, if their interests were not bought out under section 21A27, a part of the 20250HB1498PN1832 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property representing the combined interests of these cotenants as determined by the court and this part of the property shall remain undivided.§ 21A29. Considerations for partition in kind.(a) Prejudice determination.--In determining under section 21A28(a) (relating to partition alternatives) whether partition in kind would result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court shall consider the following:(1) whether the heirs property practicably can be divided among the cotenants;(2) whether partition in kind would apportion the property in such a way that the aggregate fair market value of the parcels resulting from the division would be materially less than the value of the property if it were sold as a whole, taking into account the condition under which a court-ordered sale likely would occur;(3) evidence of the collective duration of ownership or possession of the property by a cotenant and one or more predecessors in title or predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives of the cotenant or each other;(4) a cotenant's sentimental attachment to the property, including any attachment arising because the property has ancestral or other unique or special value to the cotenant;(5) the lawful use being made of the property by a cotenant and the degree to which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant could not continue the same use of the property;(6) the degree to which the cotenants have contributed their pro rata share of the property taxes, insurance and 20250HB1498PN1832 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other expenses associated with maintaining ownership of the property or have contributed to the physical improvement, maintenance or upkeep of the property; and(7) any other relevant factor.(b) Weighing totality of considerations.--The court may not consider any one factor in subsection (a) to be dispositive without weighing the totality of all relevant factors and circumstances.§ 21A30. Open-market sale, sealed bids or auction.(a) Sale requirements.--If the court orders a sale of heirs property, the sale must be an open-market sale unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids or an auction would be more economically advantageous and in the best interest of the cotenants as a group.(b) Appointment of broker.--If the court orders an open-market sale and the parties, not later than 10 days after the entry of the order, agree on a real estate broker licensed in this Commonwealth to offer the property for sale, the court shall appoint the broker and establish a reasonable commission. If the parties do not agree on a broker, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate broker licensed in this Commonwealth to offer the property for sale and shall establish a reasonable commission. The broker shall offer the property for sale in a commercially reasonable manner at a price no lower than the determination of value and on the terms and conditions established by the court.(c) Offer to purchase obtained.--If the broker appointed under subsection (b) obtains within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value:20250HB1498PN1832 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The broker shall comply with the reporting requirements in section 21A31 (relating to report of open-market sale).(2) The sale may be completed in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.(d) Options to court when no offer obtained.--If the broker appointed under subsection (b) does not obtain within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value, the court, after hearing, may:(1) approve the highest outstanding offer, if any;(2) redetermine the value of the property and order that the property continue to be offered for an additional time; or(3) order that the property be sold by sealed bids or at an auction.(e) Sale by sealed bid or auction.--If the court orders a sale by sealed bids or an auction, the court shall set terms and conditions of the sale. If the court orders an auction, the auction must be conducted under 68 Pa.C.S. § 2306(c) (relating to effect of certification of vacancy and abandonment).(f) Purchaser credit authorized.--If a purchaser is entitled to a share of the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser is entitled to a credit against the price in an amount equal to the purchaser's share of the proceeds.§ 21A31. Report of open-market sale.(a) Duty of broker.--Unless required to do so within a shorter time, a broker appointed under section 21A30(b) (relating to open-market sale, sealed bids or auction) to offer heirs property for open-market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven days after receiving an offer to 20250HB1498PN1832 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchase the property for at least the value determined under section 21A26 (relating to determination of value) or 21A30.(b) Content of report.--The report required by subsection (a) shall contain the following information:(1) A description of the property to be sold to each buyer.(2) The name of each buyer.(3) The proposed purchase price.(4) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any owner financing.(5) The amount to be paid to lienholders.(6) A statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the broker's commission.(7) Other material facts relevant to the sale.§ 21A32. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.§ 21A33. Relation to Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act.(a) General rule.--Except as provided for in subsection (b), this chapter modifies, limits or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.).(b) Exceptions.--(1) This chapter does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)).(2) This chapter does not authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the 20250HB1498PN1832 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1498PN1832 - 18 - 123